Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 1. General Provisions.

§79-29-101.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Revised Mississippi Limited Liability Company Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-101 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the short title of the chapter. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Limited liability trust companies, see § 81-27-6.301 et seq.

Cited in:

Hartwell Handle Co. v. Jack, 149 Miss. 465, 115 So. 586, 1928 Miss. LEXIS 51 (Miss. 1928).

Construction and application of limited liability company acts. 79 A.L.R.5th 689.

Lee, The Future of Limited Liability Companies For Business and Estate Planning Purposes in Mississippi. 18 Miss. College L. R. 91.

§79-29-102.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

79-29-102. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-102 was entitled: Reservation of power to amend or repeal. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-103.

§79-29-103.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

Any provision of this chapter may be altered from time to time or repealed and all rights of members, managers and officers are subject to this reservation.Unless expressly stated to the contrary in this chapter, including Article 13, any amendment of this chapter shall apply to limited liability companies and members, managers and officers without regard to either the date of the formation of the limited liability company or the date of the enactment of the amendment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-103 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 64; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 25; Laws, 1998, ch. 376, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 2000; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] provided definitions of terms used in the chapter. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-105.

§79-29-104.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-104. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

Former § 79-29-104 was entitled: Name. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-109.

§79-29-105.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bankruptcy” means an event that causes a member to cease to be a member as provided in Section 79-29-313 of this chapter.

“Certificate of formation” means the certificate referred to in Section 79-29-201, the certificate as amended or restated, and the certificate of merger.In the case of a foreign limited liability company, the term includes all documents serving a similar function that are required to be filed to form the limited liability company in the state or other jurisdiction where it is organized.

“Contribution” means any cash, property, services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services, which a person contributes to a limited liability company in the person’s capacity as a member.

“Deliver” or “delivery” means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery and electronic transmission. If delivery is to the Secretary of State, delivery may be made by electronic transmission, if, to the extent, and in the manner permitted by the Secretary of State.

“Derivative proceeding” means a civil suit in the right of a limited liability company or, to the extent provided in Article 10 of this chapter, in the right of a foreign limited liability company.

“Electronic transmission” or “electronically transmitted” means any process of communication not directly involving the physical transfer of paper that is suitable for the retention, retrieval and reproduction of information by the recipient.

“Entity” means any association or legal entity organized to conduct business, whether domestic or foreign, including, without limitation, for profit and nonprofit corporations, limited partnerships, general partnerships, limited liability partnerships, limited liability companies, joint ventures, joint-stock companies, business trusts and estates; and states, the United States, foreign governments, governmental subdivisions or governmental agencies.

“Financial interests” and “financial rights” means (i) rights to share in profits and losses as provided in Section 79-29-505; (ii) rights to share in distributions as provided in Section 79-29-507; (iii) rights to receive interim distributions as provided in Section 79-29-601; (iv) rights to receive distributions upon withdrawal as provided in Section 79-29-603; (v) rights to receive allocations of income, loss, deduction, credit or similar items; (vi) appraisal rights as provided in Section 79-29-231; and (vii) any other rights granted in the certificate of formation or the operating agreement that are in addition to the above and are designated as “financial interests” or “financial rights” by the limited liability company.Financial interests may be owned by members of a limited liability company and may be owned by persons who are not members of a limited liability company. Financial interests are assignable in whole or in part, except as otherwise provided by a limited liability company’s certificate of formation or operating agreement.

“Foreign,” with reference to any entity, means such entity that is formed or organized under laws other than the laws of this state or under the laws of any foreign country or other foreign jurisdiction and denominated as such under the laws of such state or foreign country or other foreign jurisdiction.

“Formation document” means the document that creates an entity which document is duly executed and delivered to a public official or office in the state or other foreign jurisdiction of the entity’s formation pursuant to the laws under which the entity is organized or formed.

“Governance interests” or “governance rights” means all of a member’s rights as a member in the limited liability company other than financial rights and the right to assign financial rights, including without limitation:(i) the rights to participate in the management of the limited liability company; (ii) rights to bind the limited liability company as provided in Sections 79-29-307 and 79-29-811; (iii) the right to vote for or consent to matters requiring the vote of or consent of the members, as specified in this chapter or in the certificate of formation or operating agreement; and, unless the context otherwise requires; and (iv) rights to enjoy any privileges bestowed on members of the limited liability company.Only members shall have governance rights or own governance interests in a limited liability company.

“Individual” means a natural person.

“Interests” means the proprietary interests in an entity and, with respect to a member of a limited liability company, “interests” or “membership interests” are used interchangeably and shall each mean all of the governance interests and financial interests in the limited liability company held by such member or members.

“Knowledge” means a person’s actual knowledge, rather than the person’s constructive knowledge.

“Limited liability company” or “domestic limited liability company” means an entity having one or more members that is an unincorporated company or unincorporated association formed and existing under this chapter and is not subject to Section 97-13-15.

“Manager” or “managers” means a person or persons who are named in or selected or designated pursuant to, the certificate of formation or operating agreement as a manager to manage the limited liability company to the extent and as provided in the certificate of formation or operating agreement.A limited liability company whose management is vested in a manager or managers is referred to in this chapter as a manager-managed limited liability company.

“Member” means a person who has been admitted to a limited liability company as provided in Section 79-29-301 or, in the case of a foreign limited liability company, in accordance with the laws under which the foreign limited liability company is organized.A member includes a member of a limited liability company who does not own a financial interest or who does not have an obligation to contribute capital to the limited liability company.A member may or may not have governance interests, including voting rights.A member may have other rights, powers or privileges as prescribed by the certificate of formation or the operating agreement.A limited liability company whose management is vested in the members is referred to in this chapter as a member-managed limited liability company.

“Merger” means a business combination pursuant to Section 79-29-221.

“Officer” means an individual who is named in or selected or designated pursuant to, the certificate of formation or operating agreement as an officer to manage the limited liability company to the extent and as provided in the certificate of formation or operating agreement.

“Operating agreement” or “limited liability company agreement” means any agreement, whether referred to as a limited liability company agreement or otherwise, written, oral or implied, of the member or members as to the affairs of a limited liability company and the conduct of its business. A member or manager of a limited liability company or an assignee of a financial interest is bound by the operating agreement whether or not the member or manager or assignee executes the operating agreement.A limited liability company is not required to execute its operating agreement.A limited liability company is bound by its operating agreement whether or not the limited liability company executes the operating agreement.An operating agreement of a limited liability company having only one (1) member shall not be unenforceable by reason of there being only one (1) person who is a party to the operating agreement.An operating agreement may provide rights to any person, including a person who is not a party to the operating agreement, to the extent set forth therein.A written operating agreement or another written agreement or writing:

May provide that a person shall be admitted as a member of a limited liability company, or shall become an assignee of a financial interest or of other rights or powers of a member to the extent assigned:

1. If the person, or a representative authorized by the person orally, in writing or by other action such as payment for a financial interest, executes the operating agreement or any other writing evidencing the intent of the person to become a member or assignee; or

2. Without such execution, if such person, or a representative authorized by such person orally, in writing or by other action such as payment for a financial interest, complies with the conditions for becoming a member or assignee as set forth in the operating agreement or any other writing; and

Shall not be unenforceable by reason of its not having been signed by a person being admitted as a member or becoming an assignee as provided in paragraph (t)(i) of this subsection, or by reason of its having been signed by a representative as provided in this chapter.

“Organizational documents” means the document or documents that create, or determine the internal governance of, an entity.The organizational documents of a limited liability company are the certificate of formation and the operating agreement, if any.

“Person” means an individual, entity, trust, or any other legal or commercial nominee or any personal representative.

“Personal representative” means, as to an individual, the executor, administrator, guardian, conservator or other legal representative thereof or the successor of such executor, administrator, guardian, conservator or legal representative; and, as to a person other than an individual, the legal representative or the successor of the legal representative. The legal representative of a member which has been placed in bankruptcy shall be the bankruptcy trustee or other representative designated in accordance with the bankruptcy code.

“Professional limited liability company” is a limited liability company formed and existing under Article 9 of this chapter.

“Sign” or “signature” includes any manual, facsimile, conformed or electronic signature.

“State” means the District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico or any state, territory, possession or other jurisdiction of the United States.

“Survivor” of a merger means the entity into which one or more entities are merged.A survivor of a merger may preexist the merger or be created by the merger.

“Withdraw” or “withdrawal” means, with respect to a member of a limited liability company, any voluntary act by which, pursuant to the certificate of formation or written operating agreement, a member ceases to be a member of the limited liability company and ceases to have any governance rights. Withdrawal shall include retirement, resignation or withdrawal, but shall not include the death or expulsion of a member, any event described in Section 79-29-313, or the assignment of the member’s entire interest as provided in Section 79-29-703.Any use of the term “resignation” or “retirement” in an operating agreement or certificate of formation, with respect to a member which is not defined in such document, shall mean the withdrawal of the member from the limited liability company for purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-105 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 418 § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the reservation of the exclusive right to the use of a name. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-111.

At the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, an error in a statutory reference in (t)(ii) was corrected by substituting “paragraph (t)(i) of this subsection” for “subsection (t)(i) of this subsection.”

§79-29-106.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-106. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

Former § 79-29-106 was entitled: Registered office and registered agent. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-29-107.
Form of notice and written consents.

Notice under this chapter shall be in writing unless oral notice is reasonable under the circumstances.Notice by electronic transmission is written notice.

Notice may be communicated in person; by mail or other method of delivery; or by telephone, voice mail, email or other electronic means.If these forms of personal notice are impracticable, notice may be communicated by a newspaper of general circulation in the area where published, or by radio, television or other form of public broadcast communication.

Electronically transmitted written notice by a limited liability company to its members or managers, if in a comprehensible form, is effective when electronically transmitted to the member or manager in a manner authorized by the member or manager, as applicable.

Written notice that is not electronically transmitted by a limited liability company to its members or managers, if in a comprehensible form, is effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed to the recipients shown in the limited liability company’s current list of members and managers;

On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee.

Oral notice is effective when communicated if communicated in a comprehensible manner.

Any notice permitted or required to be made under this chapter or under the operating agreement may be waived at any time.

A consent transmitted by electronic transmission by a person or by a person authorized to act for the person shall be deemed to be written and signed for purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-107 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to records that were to be kept by a limited liability company. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-115.

Right of member to inspect and copy and company record required to be maintained by this section, see § 79-29-308.

Profit and loss to be allocated on basis of the value, as stated in the limited liability company records acquired to be kept pursuant to this section, see § 79-29-503.

Distributions must be made on the basis of the value, as stated in the limited liability company records required to be kept pursuant to this section, see § 79-29-504.

§79-29-108.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-108. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-108 was entitled: Nature of business; powers. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-117.

§79-29-109.
Name.

The name of each limited liability company as set forth in its certificate of formation:

Must contain the words “limited liability company” or the abbreviation “L.L.C.” or “LLC”;

May contain the name of a member or manager;

Except as authorized by subsection (3) of this section, must be distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from (i) the name of any domestic or foreign corporation, nonprofit corporation, limited partnership, limited liability partnership or limited liability company that is organized or registered under the laws of this state and which has not been dissolved; and (ii) a name that is reserved or registered in the Office of the Secretary of State for any of the entities named in paragraph (1)(c)(i) of this section which reservation or registration has not expired; and

May not contain the following words:“bank,” “banker,” “bankers,” “banking,” “trust company,” “insurance,” “trust,” “corporation,” “incorporated,” “partnership,” “limited partnership,” or any combination or abbreviation thereof, or any words or abbreviations of similar import.

The Secretary of State shall reject any certificate of formation that does not comply with subsection (1) of this section.

A limited liability company may apply to the Secretary of State for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the records in the Office of the Secretary of State from one or more of the names described in subsection (1)(c) of this section.The Secretary of State shall authorize the use of the name applied for if:

The other domestic or foreign limited liability company, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, corporation or nonprofit corporation consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in form satisfactory to the Secretary of State to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name of the applying limited liability company; or

The applicant delivers to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant’s right to use the name applied for in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-109 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the business transactions of a member or manager with the limited liability company. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-121.

§79-29-110.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-110. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-110 was entitled: Indemnification.

§79-29-111.
Reservation of name.

The right to the use of a legal name under Section 79-29-109 may be reserved by:

A person intending to organize a limited liability company under this chapter and to adopt that name;

A domestic limited liability company or any foreign limited liability company registered in this state which, in either case, intends to adopt that name;

A foreign limited liability company intending to register in this state and adopt that name; and

A person intending to organize a foreign limited liability company and intending to have it registered in this state and adopt that name.

The reservation shall be made by delivering to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing an application, signed by the applicant, specifying the name to be reserved and the name and address of the applicant. If the Secretary of State finds that the name is available for use as a legal name by a domestic or foreign limited liability company, the Secretary of State shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant as a legal name for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days. The one-hundred-eighty-day period may be renewed once by the applicant by filing a renewal application within thirty (30) days before the expiration of the initial one-hundred-eighty-day period. The right to the exclusive use of a reserved name may be transferred to any other person by delivering to the Office of the Secretary of State a notice of the transfer, signed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

The reservation of a specified name may be cancelled by delivering to the Office of the Secretary of State a notice of cancellation, specifying the name reservation to be cancelled and the name and address of the applicant or transferee.

Unless the Secretary of State finds that any application, notice of transfer, or notice of cancellation filed with the Secretary of State as required by this section does not conform to law, upon receipt of all filing fees required by law the Secretary of State shall prepare and return to the person who filed the instrument a copy of the filed instrument with a notation thereon of the action taken by the Secretary of State.

A fee as set forth in Section 79-29-1203 of this chapter shall be paid at the time of the reservation of any name and at the time of the filing of a notice of the transfer or cancellation of any such reservation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 468, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

A former § 79-29-111 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to service on a limited liability company. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-125.

The 2014 amendment, in (2), deleted the former third sentence and added the present third sentence; and in (4), inserted “of State” following “fees required by law the Secretary of.”

§79-29-112.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-112. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-112 was entitled: Taxation. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-127.

§79-29-113.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 143, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-29-113. [Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.]

Former § 79-29-113 required that a limited liability company maintain a registered office and registered agent within the state. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-29-115.
Records to be kept.

Each limited liability company shall keep at its principal place of business the following:(a) a current list of the full name and last known street address of each member and manager; (b) a copy of the certificate of formation, together with executed copies of any powers of attorney pursuant to which any certificate has been executed; (c) copies of any then effective operating agreement; and (d) unless contained in the certificate of formation or the operating agreement, a writing setting out:(i) the amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of the other property or services contributed by each member and which each member has agreed to contribute; (ii) the times at which or events on the happening of which any additional contributions agreed to be made by each member are to be made; and (iii) any events upon the happening of which the limited liability company is to be dissolved and its affairs wound up.

The failure of the limited liability company to maintain the foregoing required records shall not, for this reason, cause any member to be liable for any debt, obligation or liability of the limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Summary judgment was proper against a claim that an attorney was negligent in failing to ensure that the parties forming a limited liability company under the provisions of the Mississippi Limited Liability Act completed a statement reflecting the contributions of each of the parties, where the attorney presented an affidavit in support of his motion for summary judgment from an attorney who had extensive experience in the formation of such companies that it was not the responsibility of the attorney to complete such form, and that the fault lay with the failure of the parties to complete the form after being advised to do so by the attorney, and the claimant did not rebut the attorney’s affidavit. McLeod v. Jackson, 829 So. 2d 722, 2002 Miss. App. LEXIS 567 (Miss. Ct. App. 2002).

§79-29-117.
Nature of business; powers.

Subject to the provisions of its certificate of formation or the operating agreement and subject to any other laws of this state which govern or limit the conduct of a particular business or activity, a limited liability company may carry on any lawful business, purpose or activity.

Every limited liability company has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Applicability of this section to foreign limited liability company, see § 79-29-1001.